District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,
25 That this act may be cited as the “Ownership and Wealth-building for our Neighbors (OWN)
26 Omnibus Amendment Act of 2026”
27 Sec. 2 The Condominium Act of 1976, effective March 29, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-89 D.C.
28 Official Code § 42–1901 et seq.), is amended as follows:
29 (a)Section 102 is amended as follows:
30 (1) A new subparagraph (27A) is added to read as follows:
31 “(27A) Reserve study” means a capital budget planning tool used to determine the
32 estimated remaining useful life of, and estimated repair or replacement cost of common element
33 components, including but not limited to common element structural components, or other
34 components of the condominium, or other improvements for which the unit owners association is
35 responsible for the repair and replacement, and an analysis of association funding capacity to

36 maintain, repair, and replace such components and recommendations for funding, and all condo
37 fee increases within the past 5 years or the lifetime of the building, whichever is lesser.
38 (b) A new section 307a is added to read as follows:
39 “(a) If the executive board oversees common elements with an aggregate replacement
40 cost exceeding $10,000 and has had a reserve study conducted on or after January 1, 2023, then
41 the executive board shall conduct an updated reserve study within 5 years after the date the
42 reserve study was conducted, and at least every 5 years thereafter to assess the condition of and
43 planning for repair and maintenance of the common elements and other components of the
44 condominium for which the unit owners association is responsible.
45 “(b) If the executive board oversees common elements with an aggregate replacement
46 cost exceeding $10,000 and has not conducted a reserve study on or after January 1, 2023, then
47 the executive board shall conduct a reserve study on or before January 1, 2028, and shall update
48 the study at least every 5 years thereafter to assess the condition of and planning for repair and
49 maintenance of the common elements and other components of the condominium for which the
50 unit owners association is responsible.
51 “(c) Each reserve study required under this section shall be prepared by or attested to by a
52 person who either:
53 “(1) Holds a current license from the Board of Professional Engineer, or Board of
54 Architecture, Interior Design, and Landscape Architecture; or
55 “(2) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community Association
56 Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional Reserve Analysts.
57 “(d) As part of its periodic budget preparation process, the executive board shall review
58 the reserve funding annually for adequacy and make any adjustments to the annual budget and

59 annual assessment the executive board deems necessary to maintain reserves, as appropriate. The
60 executive board may meet repair and replacement needs through replacement reserves,
61 assessments, or borrowed funds.
62 “(e) If a reserve study conducted in accordance with this section indicates a need to
63 budget for reserves, the unit owners’ association budget shall include:
64 “(1) As of the beginning of the fiscal year for which the budget is prepared, the
65 current amount of accumulated cash reserves set aside to repair, replace, or restore the common
66 element components, including common element structural components, and other components
67 under association responsibility and the amount of the expected contribution to the reserve fund
68 for that fiscal year;
69 “(2) A statement describing the procedures used for estimation and accumulation
70 of cash reserves pursuant to this section; and
71 “(3)A statement of the amount of reserves recommended in the study and the
72 amount of current cash for replacement reserves.
73 “(f) The study shall be presented to the prospective buyer at time of sale”
74 Sec. 3. Section 103 of the Inclusionary Zoning Implementation Amendment Act of 2006,
75 effective March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-275; D.C. Official Code § 6-1041.03), is amended as
76 follows:
77 (a) Subsection (c) is amended by striking “Except as provided in subsection (d) the” and
78 inserting the word “The” in its place.
79 (b) Subsection (d) is repealed.
80 (c) A new subsection (e) is added to read as follows

81 “(e)(1) Upon the second or subsequent sale of an inclusionary unit, whether directly to an
82 eligible household or through a purchase by the Mayor, the seller shall receive an equity payment
83 from the Mayor.
84 “(2) The equity payment shall equal the purchase price paid by the seller
85 multiplied by the amount by which the market appreciation percentage exceeds the regulated
86 appreciation percentage. If the market appreciation percentage does not exceed the regulated
87 appreciation percentage, no equity payment shall be due.
88 “(3) In a direct sale to an eligible household, the household shall pay the regulated
89 sales price and the Mayor shall deposit the equity payment with the settlement agent before
90 closing. The equity payment shall be disbursed only if the sale closes.
91 “(4) The equity payment shall not increase the price paid by the next eligible
92 household, be financed by that household, or be included when calculating a future maximum
93 purchase price. The affordability covenant shall remain in effect.
94 “(5) The Mayor, pursuant to § 2-501 et seq., may issue rules to implement the
95 provisions of this subsection.
96 “(6) For purposes of this subsection:
97 “(A) ‘Market appreciation percentage’ means the percentage increase from
98 the appraised market value of the inclusionary unit when the seller purchased it to the appraised
99 market value when the seller sells it. Each appraisal shall determine the market value of the unit
100 without regard to the affordability covenant.
101 “(B) ‘Regulated appreciation percentage’ means:

102 “(i) If the maximum purchase price under subsection (c) of this
103 section is calculated using the consumer price index, the percentage by which the consumer price
104 index has increased since the seller purchased the unit; or
105 “(ii) If the Mayor uses another formula under subsection (c) of this
106 section, the percentage increase in the seller’s purchase price provided by that formula, excluding
107 adjustments for eligible improvements.
108 “(iii) The regulated appreciation percentage shall not be less than
109 zero.
110
111 Sec. 4. The Home Purchase Assistance Fund Act of 1978, effective September 12, 1978
112 (D.C. Law 2-103; D.C. Official Code § 42-2601 et seq.), is amended as follows:
113 (a) Section 3a(f)(1) (D.C. Official Code § 42-2602.01(f)(1)) is amended by striking the
114 phrase "this section" and inserting the phrase "this section, section 3a-1, and section 3a-2" in its
115 place.
116 (b) New sections 3a-1 and 3a-2 are added to read as follows:
117 "Sec. 3a-1. Qualification for Program assistance.
118 "(a) An applicant shall apply for Program assistance through a participating lender.
119 "(b) A participating lender shall perform qualification concurrently with its underwriting
120 of the first trust mortgage for the subject transaction, utilizing a uniform worksheet prescribed by
121 the Mayor. The participating lender shall submit the completed worksheet and all supporting
122 documentation directly to the Mayor.
123 "(c) The Mayor shall make the final determination of applicant eligibility. The Mayor
124 shall directly verify each applicant's income eligibility and shall not delegate this verification.

125 The Mayor’s review of an application file shall be strictly limited to assessing statutory and
126 regulatory eligibility, underlying funding-source requirements, quality control, and the accuracy
127 and completeness of the uniform worksheet. The Mayor shall not repeat or duplicate the
128 participating lender's underwriting unless:
129 "(1) There is a discrepancy in the submitted file;
130 "(2) There is an indication of fraud or misrepresentation; or
131 "(3) An applicable funding-source requirement is not addressed by the uniform
132 worksheet.
133 "(d) If a submitted file is deficient, the Mayor shall identify all deficiencies in a single
134 written notice. The Mayor shall issue a final eligibility determination within 15 business days
135 after receiving a complete file. The Mayor may extend this 15-day period by up to 10 additional
136 business days for any circumstance described in subsection (e) of this section, provided that the
137 Mayor issues prior written notice to the applicant and the participating lender detailing the
138 specific reason for the extension.
139 "(e) A denial of qualification by a participating lender shall be issued in writing, shall
140 specify the reasons for the denial, and shall not terminate the applicant's eligibility to seek
141 Program assistance elsewhere. Documentation verified by a participating lender shall remain
142 valid and transferable for 120 days for use by another participating lender, unless a fact material
143 to the applicant's eligibility has changed.
144 "(f) A participating lender shall not charge an applicant any fee for performing
145 qualification, submitting an application to the Program, or receiving Program assistance.
146 "(g) Not less than once annually, the Mayor shall review a representative sample of
147 qualification files from each participating lender. The Mayor shall evaluate each participating

148 lender's qualification and denial rates for disparities based on any trait protected by the Human
149 Rights Act of 1977, effective December 13, 1977 (D.C. Law 2-38; D.C. Official Code § 2-
150 1401.01 et seq.). The Mayor may mandate corrective action or suspend or terminate a
151 participating lender agreement accordingly.
152 "(h) Annually, the Mayor shall publish and transmit a report to the Council detailing:
153 "(1) The number of participating lenders and the number of those lenders that
154 qualified at least one applicant;
155 "(2) The number of applicants qualified, denied, and closed by each participating
156 lender;
157 "(3) The median and 90th percentile number of business days elapsed from receipt
158 of a complete file to the issuance of a determination; and
159 "(4) The number of files returned for deficiencies.
160 "(i) The Mayor shall disaggregate the data required by this subsection by race, sex,
161 income band, and ward, provided that the applicant has voluntarily furnished this demographic
162 information and its disclosure would not identify an individual applicant.
163 "(j) For the purposes of this section, the term:
164 "(1) 'Participating lender' means a lender that maintains an executed participating
165 lender agreement with the Mayor.
166 "(2) 'Qualification' means the verification of assets, liabilities, credit history, and
167 repayment capacity; the terms of the proposed first trust mortgage; the appraised value of the
168 property to be purchased; and the amount of Program assistance for which the applicant appears
169 eligible.
170 "Sec. 3a-2. Homebuyer education and counseling.

171 "(a) The Mayor shall make group homebuyer education available in a self-paced,
172 asynchronous format at no charge to participants. Successful completion of this curriculum
173 satisfies any group homebuyer education requirement established by the Program. This
174 requirements shall not be applicable to individualized housing counseling that is required by 24
175 C.F.R. § 92.254(a)(3).
176 "(b) The asynchronous group homebuyer education platform shall:
177 "(1) Operate compatibly on mobile devices;
178 "(2) Automatically preserve and record a participant's progress;
179 "(3) Comply with all applicable federal and District accessibility standards;
180 "(c) The Mayor shall establish objective completion standards for asynchronous group
181 homebuyer education that verify active participation and substantive comprehension of
182 curriculum content. These standards shall allow participants to retake course assessments without
183 penalty.
184 "(d) The Mayor shall publish annually on its website and transmit to the Council a report
185 specifying:
186 "(1) The number of participants choosing each respective format of group
187 homebuyer education;
188 "(2) The median elapsed time from enrollment to completion and the overall
189 noncompletion rate for each format;
190 "(3) The median wait time, measured in days, from an applicant's initial request to
191 the delivery of their first individualized housing counseling session; and
192 "(4) The rate at which participants completing each format receive an eligibility
193 determination and successfully close on a home purchase.".

194 "(e) For the purposes of this section, the term:
195 "(1) 'Asynchronous' means an on-demand instructional delivery method
196 permitting a participant to initiate, pause, resume, and complete coursework at times of the
197 participant's choosing, without mandatory attendance at scheduled sessions.
198 "(2) 'Individualized housing counseling' means one-on-one professional guidance
199 delivered by a qualified housing counselor, consisting of client intake, an evaluation of the
200 participant's financial profile and the affordability of the prospective home purchase, preparation
201 of a customized written action plan, and documented reasonable follow-up efforts.
202 Sec. 5 The District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency Act, effective March 3, 1979
203 (D.C. Law 2-135; D.C. Official Code 42-2703.01 et seq.). is amended by adding new sections
204 307b, 307c, and 307d to read as follows:
205 (a) “Sec. 307b. Residential Mortgage Foreclosure Prevention Program.
206 “(a)(l) The Agency shall establish a Residential Mortgage Foreclosure Prevention
207 Program ("program") that allows qualified homeowners to apply for and receive financial
208 assistance for payment of past due residential mortgage payments, property taxes, property
209 insurance debts, condominium fees, and homeowner association fees that have put the qualified
210 homeowner at risk of foreclosure of their primary residence.
211 “(2) The Agency shall make financial assistance available to qualified
212 homeowners with a demonstrated ability to pay their housing costs going forward. The types of
213 assistance shall be subject to Agency underwriting and have the following criteria:
214 “(A) A low-interest loan that does not collect interest or require payments
215 for at least the first 2 years for applicants with an income of 100% AMI or greater, based on

216 household size in accordance with the Washington Metropolitan Statistical Area as set forth in
217 the periodic calculation provided by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.
218 “(B) A zero-interest loan that requires repayment at the time of sale or
219 refinance of the subject property for qualified homeowners with an income less than 100% AMI
220 based on household size in accordance with the Washington Metropolitan Statistical Area as set
221 forth in the periodic calculation provided by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban
222 Development.
223 “(3) The Agency shall establish a standardized application process, requirements,
224 and underwriting criteria for qualified homeowners in need of the program.
225 “(4) The Agency shall set an appropriate repayment timeline based on the
226 qualified homeowner’s repayment feasibility and ensure that all associated housing costs will not
227 exceed 50% of the applicant's income. The repayment timeline shall undergo an annual
228 recertification.
229 “(b) The Agency shall record a lien on the subject property in the amount of the financial
230 assistance provided to the qualified homeowner. The lien shall be subordinate to all other existing
231 loans on the subject property.
232 “(c) The applicant shall be required to attend annual housing counseling with a HUD
233 certified housing counseling service as defined in section 214 of the Housing and Urban
234 Development Code [24 U.S.C. § 214.3].
235 “(d) Other than instances of a refinance, no qualified homeowner may receive more than
236 $40,000 in lifetime assistance.
237 “(e) All repayments of loans administered by the program shall be remitted to the fund
238 established in section 307d.

239 “(f) For the purposes of this section, the term:
240 “(1) “At risk of foreclosure” means:
241 “(A) A mortgage lender has provided a homeowner with legal notice that
242 the homeowner is in default on the terms of a residential mortgage on the home in which the
243 homeowner lives for failure to pay; or
244 “(B) A homeowner experiencing financial hardship that will not allow for
245 the homeowner to make upcoming payments on a residential mortgage, property taxes, property
246 insurance debts, condominium fees, and homeowner association fees.
247 “(2) “Financial hardship” means a material reduction in income or material
248 increase in living expenses such as job loss, reduction in income, or increased costs due to
249 healthcare or the need to care for a family member, that has created or increased a risk of
250 mortgage delinquency, mortgage default, foreclosure, or displacement for a homeowner.
251 “(3) “Exhausted alternative financing” means:
252 “(A) In the case of a residential mortgage, a District homeowner who has
253 sought alternative means of loss mitigation, which is evidenced by:
254 “(i) A referral to the Agency from a HUD certified foreclosure
255 prevention housing counseling service as defined in section 214 of the Housing and Urban
256 Development Code [24 U.S.C. § 214.3].
257 “(ii) A Loss Mitigation Denial Notice or Denial Letter from the
258 applicant’s lender.
259 “(iii) A Loss Mitigation Offer Letter or Approval Notice from a
260 lender that the applicant would exceed 50% of the applicant's gross income.

261 “(B) In the case of a non-mortgage default, a referral to the Agency a
262 HUD certified foreclosure prevention housing counseling service as defined in section 214 of the
263 Housing and Urban Development Code [24 U.S.C. § 214.3].
264 “(3) “Qualified homeowner” means a District homeowner who is experiencing
265 financial hardship, is at risk of foreclosure, has exhausted alternative financing, and makes less
266 than 250% AMI based on household size in accordance with the Washington Metropolitan
267 Statistical Area as set forth in the periodic calculation provided by the U.S. Department of
268 Housing and Urban Development.
269 "(4) "Subject property" means the home in which a homeowner who is at
270 risk of foreclosure lives.
271 Sec. 307c. Funding Foreclosure Prevention.
272 “(a)(1)(A) For each residential mortgage loan originated within or outside of the District
273 of Columbia and related to property located within the District of Columbia, excepting only
274 reverse mortgage loans issued to seniors over the age of 62, the escrow agent or other settlement
275 or closing agent shall collect and remit to the Agency a foreclosure prevention fee of $100 at the
276 time of closing to be deposited in the fund established in section 307d. This fee may be financed
277 in the loan and paid from the loan proceeds or from any borrower cash contribution at the time of
278 closing.
279 “(B) At or before the time that the foreclosure prevention fee is assessed under
280 subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the escrow agent or other settlement or closing agent shall
281 provide the borrower with a notice of the foreclosure prevention fee and its purpose. The Agency
282 shall create a notice form that an escrow agent or other settlement or closing agent may use to
283 satisfy this notice requirement.

284 “(2) For each residential real property for which a notice of default has been issued, the
285 beneficiary issuing the notice of default shall remit a default fee of $250 to the Agency to the
286 fund established in section 307d. The $250 payment shall be required per property and not per
287 notice of default. The beneficiary shall not, directly or indirectly, charge the borrower for this fee
288 at any time during the foreclosure process.
289 “(3) The Agency may make policies and procedures related to the implementation,
290 collection, remittance, and management of the fees and may enter into individualized agreements
291 with third parties governing the efficient remittance of the fees.
292 “(4) The obligation to remit fees required pursuant to this section shall survive any error,
293 omission, or failure by a settlement agent, escrow agent, or other third party acting on behalf of a
294 lender, beneficiary, or mortgage servicer.
295 “(5) A borrower shall not be held liable for the failure of another person or entity to
296 collect or remit amounts required pursuant to this section.
297 “(6) For the purposes of this section, "residential real property" includes residential real
298 property with up to four dwelling units, whether or not the property or any part thereof is owner
299 occupied.
300 Sec. 307d. Residential Mortgage Foreclosure Prevention Program Fund.
301 “(a)(1) There is established as a non-lapsing Residential Mortgage Foreclosure
302 Prevention Program Fund (“Fund”), which the Agency shall administer in accordance with this
303 section. The Fund shall consist of:
304 “(A) Fees collected pursuant to section 307c;
305 “(B) Appropriations made by the Council;

306 “(C) Grants, gifts, donations, and bequests accepted by the Agency for the
307 purposes of the Fund; and
308 “(D) Interest earned on monies deposited into the fund.
309 “(2) Monies deposited into the fund, and interest earned thereon, shall not revert to the
310 unrestricted fund balance of the District of Columbia General Fund at the end of a fiscal year, or
311 at any other time, but shall be continually available to the Agency without fiscal year limitation,
312 subject to authorization by Congress.
313 “(3) The Agency shall use monies in the fund for the purposes of carrying out the
314 Foreclosure Prevention Program established pursuant to section 307b, including:
315 “(A) Disbursing low-interest loans that does not collect interest or require
316 payments for the first 2 years for applicants with an income of 100% AMI or greater, based on
317 household size in accordance with the Washington Metropolitan Statistical Area as set forth in
318 the periodic calculation provided by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.
319 “(B) Disbursing zero-interest loans that requires repayment at the time of sale or
320 refinance of the subject property for qualified homeowners with an income less than 100% AMI
321 based on household size in accordance with the Washington Metropolitan Statistical Area as set
322 forth in the periodic calculation provided by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban
323 Development; and
324 “(C) Funding administrative expenses associated with implementation and
325 operation of the program.
326 “(4) The Chief Financial Officer shall invest monies in the fund in accordance
327 with § 47-351.02, and all interest earned from such investments shall be credited to the
328 fund.

329 “(5) The Agency may issue policies, procedures, guidance, and forms necessary
330 to administer the fund and may enter into agreements necessary for the collection,
331 remittance, administration, and disbursement of monies deposited into the fund.
332 “(6) The Agency shall include in its annual report information concerning
333 “(A) Revenues deposited into the fund;
334 “(B) Expenditures from the fund;
335 “(C) The number of households served through the program; and
336 “(D) Program outcomes and performance metrics established by the
337 Agency.
338 Sec. 6. Fiscal impact statement.
339 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
340 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
341 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
342 Sec. 7. Effective date.
343 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
344 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
345 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
346 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).